Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/kik_KE.aff
FLAG num
# All Noun Classes Subject, Assumed Object, Present Progressive, Current, near past -ra-, -raa-, 
PFX 613 Y 150
PFX 613 0 ndĩra [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e ndĩre e
PFX 613 ĩ ndĩre ĩ
PFX 613 o ndĩro o
PFX 613 ũ ndĩro ũ
PFX 613 0 ndĩraa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e ndĩree e
PFX 613 ĩ ndĩree ĩ
PFX 613 o ndĩroo o
PFX 613 ũ ndĩroo ũ
PFX 613 0 tũra [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e tũre e
PFX 613 ĩ tũre ĩ
PFX 613 o tũro o
PFX 613 ũ tũro ũ
PFX 613 0 tũraa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e tũree e
PFX 613 ĩ tũree ĩ
PFX 613 o tũroo o
PFX 613 ũ tũroo ũ
PFX 613 0 ũra [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e ũre e
PFX 613 ĩ ũre ĩ
PFX 613 o ũro o
PFX 613 ũ ũro ũ
PFX 613 0 ũraa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e ũree e
PFX 613 ĩ ũree ĩ
PFX 613 o ũroo o
PFX 613 ũ ũroo ũ
PFX 613 0 mũra [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e mũre e
PFX 613 ĩ mũre ĩ
PFX 613 o mũro o
PFX 613 ũ mũro ũ
PFX 613 0 mũraa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e mũree e
PFX 613 ĩ mũree ĩ
PFX 613 o mũroo o
PFX 613 ũ mũroo ũ
PFX 613 0 ara [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e are e
PFX 613 ĩ are ĩ
PFX 613 o aro o
PFX 613 ũ aro ũ
PFX 613 0 araa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e aree e
PFX 613 ĩ aree ĩ
PFX 613 o aroo o
PFX 613 ũ aroo ũ
PFX 613 0 mara [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e mare e
PFX 613 ĩ mare ĩ
PFX 613 o maro o
PFX 613 ũ maro ũ
PFX 613 0 maraa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e maree e
PFX 613 ĩ maree ĩ
PFX 613 o maroo o
PFX 613 ũ maroo ũ
PFX 613 0 ĩra [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e ĩre e
PFX 613 ĩ ĩre ĩ
PFX 613 o ĩro o
PFX 613 ũ ĩro ũ
PFX 613 0 ĩraa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e ĩree e
PFX 613 ĩ ĩree ĩ
PFX 613 o ĩroo o
PFX 613 ũ ĩroo ũ
PFX 613 0 rĩra [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e rĩre e
PFX 613 ĩ rĩre ĩ
PFX 613 o rĩro o
PFX 613 ũ rĩro ũ
PFX 613 0 rĩraa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e rĩree e
PFX 613 ĩ rĩree ĩ
PFX 613 o rĩroo o
PFX 613 ũ rĩroo ũ
PFX 613 0 kĩra [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e kĩre e
PFX 613 ĩ kĩre ĩ
PFX 613 o kĩro o
PFX 613 ũ kĩro ũ
PFX 613 0 kĩraa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e kĩree e
PFX 613 ĩ kĩree ĩ
PFX 613 o kĩroo o
PFX 613 ũ kĩroo ũ
PFX 613 0 ira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e ire e
PFX 613 ĩ ire ĩ
PFX 613 o iro o
PFX 613 ũ iro ũ
PFX 613 0 iraa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e iree e
PFX 613 ĩ iree ĩ
PFX 613 o iroo o
PFX 613 ũ iroo ũ
PFX 613 0 cira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e cire e
PFX 613 ĩ cire ĩ
PFX 613 o ciro o
PFX 613 ũ ciro ũ
PFX 613 0 ciraa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e ciree e
PFX 613 ĩ ciree ĩ
PFX 613 o ciroo o
PFX 613 ũ ciroo ũ
PFX 613 0 rũra [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e rũre e
PFX 613 ĩ rũre ĩ
PFX 613 o rũro o
PFX 613 ũ rũro ũ
PFX 613 0 rũraa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e rũree e
PFX 613 ĩ rũree ĩ
PFX 613 o rũroo o
PFX 613 ũ rũroo ũ
PFX 613 0 kara [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e kare e
PFX 613 ĩ kare ĩ
PFX 613 o karo o
PFX 613 ũ karo ũ
PFX 613 0 karaa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e karee e
PFX 613 ĩ karee ĩ
PFX 613 o karoo o
PFX 613 ũ karoo ũ
PFX 613 0 kũra [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e kũre e
PFX 613 ĩ kũre ĩ
PFX 613 o kũro o
PFX 613 ũ kũro ũ
PFX 613 0 kũraa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e kũree e
PFX 613 ĩ kũree ĩ
PFX 613 o kũroo o
PFX 613 ũ kũroo ũ
PFX 613 0 hara [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e hare e
PFX 613 ĩ hare ĩ
PFX 613 o haro o
PFX 613 ũ haro ũ
PFX 613 0 haraa [^eĩoũ]
PFX 613 e haree e
PFX 613 ĩ haree ĩ
PFX 613 o haroo o
PFX 613 ũ haroo ũ

# Negation, All Noun Classes Subject, Assumed Object, Present Progressive, Current, near past -ra-, -raa-, 
PFX 713 Y 75
PFX 713 0 ndira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e ndire e
PFX 713 ĩ ndire ĩ
PFX 713 o ndiro o
PFX 713 ũ ndiro ũ
PFX 713 0 tũtira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e tũtire e
PFX 713 ĩ tũtire ĩ
PFX 713 o tũtiro o
PFX 713 ũ tũtiro ũ
PFX 713 0 ndũra [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e ndũre e
PFX 713 ĩ ndũre ĩ
PFX 713 o ndũro o
PFX 713 ũ ndũro ũ
PFX 713 0 mũtira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e mũtire e
PFX 713 ĩ mũtire ĩ
PFX 713 o mũtiro o
PFX 713 ũ mũtiro ũ
PFX 713 0 ndara [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e ndare e
PFX 713 ĩ ndare ĩ
PFX 713 o ndaro o
PFX 713 ũ ndaro ũ
PFX 713 0 matira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e matire e
PFX 713 ĩ matire ĩ
PFX 713 o matiro o
PFX 713 ũ matiro ũ
PFX 713 0 ndĩra [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e ndĩre e
PFX 713 ĩ ndĩre ĩ
PFX 713 o ndĩro o
PFX 713 ũ ndĩro ũ
PFX 713 0 rĩtira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e rĩtire e
PFX 713 ĩ rĩtire ĩ
PFX 713 o rĩtiro o
PFX 713 ũ rĩtiro ũ
PFX 713 0 gĩtira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e gĩtire e
PFX 713 ĩ gĩtire ĩ
PFX 713 o gĩtiro o
PFX 713 ũ gĩtiro ũ
PFX 713 0 itira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e itire e
PFX 713 ĩ itire ĩ
PFX 713 o itiro o
PFX 713 ũ itiro ũ
PFX 713 0 citira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e citire e
PFX 713 ĩ citire ĩ
PFX 713 o citiro o
PFX 713 ũ citiro ũ
PFX 713 0 rũtira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e rũtire e
PFX 713 ĩ rũtire ĩ
PFX 713 o rũtiro o
PFX 713 ũ rũtiro ũ
PFX 713 0 gatira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e gatire e
PFX 713 ĩ gatire ĩ
PFX 713 o gatiro o
PFX 713 ũ gatiro ũ
PFX 713 0 gũtira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e gũtire e
PFX 713 ĩ gũtire ĩ
PFX 713 o gũtiro o
PFX 713 ũ gũtiro ũ
PFX 713 0 hatira [^eĩoũ]
PFX 713 e hatire e
PFX 713 ĩ hatire ĩ
PFX 713 o hatiro o
PFX 713 ũ hatiro ũ
