Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/kik_KE.dic
agaga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
aka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ambata/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
andĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
arahuka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
athamia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
baara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
batithia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
buta/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
cakaya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
canjamuka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
carũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
cera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
cicia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
cimba/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
cogotha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
cong'era/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
cuuha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
cũnga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ehuta/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
enja/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
erera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
erũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gagaya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
garũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gaya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gega/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
gereka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
getha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
goma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gucia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
guna/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gurumũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
guĩma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gwata/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gũmũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
haanda/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hahũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hamba/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hang'a/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hata/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
heenia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
hehenja/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
heta/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
hika/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hingara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hitha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hoca/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
honoka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
hoya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
humba/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hungura/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
huuhia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
huura/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hĩnda/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hĩta/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hũmbũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hũyũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hũũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
iga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ihũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ima/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
inaina/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ingata/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ita/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
iyũkia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kaania/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kea/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
kena/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
kinya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kobia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
komonga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
koroga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
kuhĩrĩria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kuna/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kunya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kurura/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kuuha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kĩĩnda/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kũnja/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kũũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
maka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
memenda/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
menyerera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
miina/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
mumunya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
mura/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ne/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
ng'aũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ng'etha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
niara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
noga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
nunga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
nyarira/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
nyoota/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
nyuguta/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
oroota/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
oya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
raiha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ratha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rega/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
rekera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
rera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
ringa/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
roga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
ruma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rĩa/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rũga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
taara/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tandĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
te/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
tembũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
teta/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thamaka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
theka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thiaya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thima/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thirĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thiũkũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thondeka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thukia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thĩĩna/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thũũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tiinda/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tobora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
toonya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
tukania/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tura/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tuĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tũma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
uga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
uruga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ĩthĩha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũmbana/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũnũha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
